New York, session 2025-2026, A11688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3217-b of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (q) to read as follows: 3 (q) (1) No insurer, health maintenance organization, or any other 4 entity subject to this article shall, by contract, written policy, or 5 procedure, reduce the payment of a negotiated rate for evaluation and 6 management or procedural services furnished by a participating provider 7 that are otherwise covered services, solely because the provider also 8 billed other health care services, including but not limited to minor 9 procedures, on the same day as the evaluation and management or proce- 10 dural services. 11 (2) Any provision of a participating provider agreement that allows 12 for a reduction in reimbursement as prohibited by this subsection shall 13 be void and unenforceable. 14 (3) With respect to an insured enrolled in a health benefit plan under 15 which the insurer or utilization review organization only provides 16 administrative services, the obligations created by this subsection 17 shall be limited to recommending to the third-party payor that coverage 18 and payment should be authorized in accordance with the prohibitions set 19 forth herein. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 21 contracts and policies issued, renewed, modified, or amended on or after 22 such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16240-01-6